Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,102
Nonresident; driving privilege; revocation, suspension, or impoundment.

The privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the highways of this state given to a nonresident shall be subject to suspension or revocation by the director or revocation or impoundment by the trial magistrate or judge in like manner and for like cause as an operator's license may be suspended, revoked, or impounded. The director may, upon receiving a copy of a judgment of the conviction in this state of a nonresident driver of a motor vehicle of any offense under the motor vehicle laws of this state, transmit a certified copy of such judgment of conviction to the motor vehicle administrator in the state wherein the person so convicted is a resident.

Laws 1937, c. 141, § 23, p. 518;

Laws 1941, c. 124, § 4, p. 472;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 60-428;

R.S.1943, § 60-422;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-422;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 52;

Laws 1991, LB 420, § 12;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 22.

Defendant's analysis of this section failed to take into account other sections of statute. State v. Smith, 181 Neb. 846, 152 N.W.2d 16 (1967).